Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3569
Hospital districts; bonds; maturity; payment.

When any registered bonds shall mature, the same shall be paid off by the treasurer at the place where the same shall be payable out of any money in his hands or under his control for that purpose, and when so paid the same shall be endorsed by the treasurer on the face thereof Canceled, together with the date of such payment, and thereupon shall be filed with the clerk who shall enter satisfaction of such bonds upon the records of such hospital district.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 16, p. 356;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.64.